Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 32, 1st
Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 840-
2.20D), is amended to read as follows:
Section 840-2.20D. A. Any full-time employee of this state
who has been employed by the any state agency for at least two (2)
years prior to the request for leave and remains in good standing
shall be entitled to six (6) weeks of paid maternity leave following
the birth or adoption of the employee's child.
B. Paid maternity leave pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as
authorized by Section 840-2.20 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 15250 Page 1

C. An employee who is granted maternity leave pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall receive the employee's annual
salary without interruption during the maternity leave. For
purposes of determining seniority, pay or pay advancement, and
performance awards, and for the receipt of any benefit that may be
affected by maternity leave, the service of the employee shall be
considered uninterrupted by the maternity leave.
D. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-15250 TKR 01/12/26











Req. No. 15250 Page 2